Utah statutes.
24-4-109.   Postjudgment interest.

In any proceeding to forfeit currency or other negotiable instruments under this chapter, the court shall award a prevailing party postjudgment interest on the currency or negotiable instruments at the interest rate established under Section 15-1-4.



Enacted by Chapter 394, 2013 General Session

